cs: Provedení obuvi: Úzké; Běžná; Široké; Jiné
el: Εφαρμογή παπουτσιού: Στενό; Κανονική; Ευρυγώνιος; Άλλο
nl: Schoenpasvorm: Smal; Normaal; Breed; Andere
bg-BG: Прилягане на обувки: Тесни; Нормални; Широки; Други
sk-SK: Šírka topánky: Úzky; Bežný; Široký; Iné
th: พอดีกับรองเท้า: แคบ; แบบปกติ; กว้าง; อื่นๆ
ru: Посадка обуви: Узкие; Обычные; Широкие; Другие
ja: 靴のフィット感: ナロー; レギュラー; ワイド; その他
hr-HR: Kalup obuće: Uski; Regularni; Široki; Ostalo
sv: Skopassform: Smal; Vanligt; Vid; Övrigt
fi: Kengän istuvuus: Kapea; Tavallinen; Leveä; Muu
ko: 신발 핏: 좁음; 레귤러; 넓음; 기타
es: Ajuste del calzado: Angosto; Regular; Ancho; Otros
ro-RO: Potrivire pantof: Îngust; Normal; Lat; Altele
da: Skopasform: Smal; Almindelig; Bred; Andet
tr: Ayakkabı Fiti: Dar; Normal; Geniş; Diğer
de: Schuhpassform: Eng; Normal; Weit; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Ajuste de calçado: Estreito; Regular; Largo; Outro
en: Shoe fit: Narrow; Regular; Wide; Other
hu: Cipő illeszkedése: Keskeny; Normál; Széles; Egyéb
sl-SI: Širina čevljev: Ozek; Običajen; Širok; Drugo
it: Vestibilità della scarpa: Stretta; Regular; Larga; Altro
nb: Shoetilpasning: Smal; Vanlig; Bred; Annet
lt-LT: Batų plotis: Siauri; Įprasti; Platūs; Kita
pl: Dopasowanie obuwia: Wąski; Zwyczajne; Szerokość; Inne
fr: Coupe de la chaussure: Étroit; Normale; Large; Autre
pt-PT: Encaixe de calçado: Estreito; Tradicionais; Largo; Outro
zh-CN: 鞋贴合度: 窄; 普通; 宽; 其他
zh-TW: 鞋型適合: 狹窄; 一般; 寬; 其他
vi: Độ vừa của giày: Hẹp; Loại thông thường; Rộng; Khác